apertium-ava.ava.lexc
LEXICON N-MURSHID 
! муршид (-ас, -асул, -ал//-заби)
N-VAS ;

%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>заби CLIT-SUBST-II ;  ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<erg%>:%>забаз CLIT-SUBST-I ;  ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:%>забазул CLIT-SUBST-I ;  ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:%>забазе CLIT-SUBST-I ;  ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>забаз LOC-CASES ;  ! Dir/LR

LEXICON N-GIALIMCHI
! гӏалимч/и (-ияс, -ясул, гӏалимзаби)

:чи N-VAS-SG ; 

%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>заби CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<erg%>:%>забаз CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:%>забазул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:%>забазе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>забаз LOC-CASES ; 

LEXICON N-BIHINCHI
! бихьинчи (-яс, -ясул, бихьинал)

:чи N-VAS-SG ; 

%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>ал CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<erg%>:%>з CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:%>зул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:%>зе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>з LOC-CASES ; 

LEXICON N-TURKAV
! турка/в (-с, -сул, -л)

%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:в CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<erg%>:%>с CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>сул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:%>се CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>:%>с LOC-CASES ; 
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>л CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<erg%>:%>з CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:%>зул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:%>зе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>з LOC-CASES ; 

LEXICON N-TIEH
! тӏехь² (-алъ//тӏохьоца, -алъул//тӏохьол, тӏахьал//тӏухьдул)

%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ехь CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<erg%>:ехь%>алъ CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ехь%>алъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ехь%>алъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:ехь%>ал%{ъ%} LOC-CASES ;
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ахь%>ал CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<erg%>:ахь%>аз CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:ахь%>азул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ахь%>азе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>:ахь%>аз LOC-CASES ; 

%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<erg%>:охь%>оца CLIT-SUBST-I ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:охь%>ол CLIT-SUBST-I ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:охь%>ое CLIT-SUBST-I ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:охь%>о LOC-CASES ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:ухь%>дул CLIT-SUBST-II ; ! Dir/LR
!%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<erg%>:охь%>оз CLIT-SUBST-I ; ! Dir/LR
!%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:охь%>озул CLIT-SUBST-I ; ! Dir/LR
!%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:охь%>озе CLIT-SUBST-I ; ! Dir/LR
!%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>:охь%>оз LOC-CASES ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON N-CHIUZHUGIADAN
! чӏужугӏада/н (-малъ, -малъул, руччаби)

чӏужугӏадан%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:чӏужугӏадан CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
чӏужугӏадан%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<erg%>:чӏужугӏадам%>%{a%}лъ CLIT-SUBST-I ; ! Dir/LR
чӏужугӏадан%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:чӏужугӏадам%>%{a%}лъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; ! Dir/LR
чӏужугӏадан%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:чӏужугӏадам%>%{a%}лъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; ! Dir/LR
чӏужугӏадан%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>:чӏужугӏадам%>%{a%}л LOC-CASES ; ! Dir/LR
чӏужугӏадан%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<erg%>:чӏужугӏадан%>%{a%}лъ CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
чӏужугӏадан%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:чӏужугӏадан%>%{a%}лъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
чӏужугӏадан%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:чӏужугӏадан%>%{a%}лъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
чӏужугӏадан%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>:чӏужугӏадан%>%{a%}л LOC-CASES ; 
чӏужугӏадан%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:руччаби CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
чӏужугӏадан%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<erg%>:руччабаз CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
чӏужугӏадан%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:руччабаз%>ул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
чӏужугӏадан%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:руччабаз%>е CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
чӏужугӏадан%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>:руччабаз%> LOC-CASES ; 

LEXICON N-CHIUZHU
! чӏужу (-ялъ, -ялъул, руччаби)

чӏужу%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:чӏужу CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
чӏужу%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<erg%>:чӏужу%>%{a%}лъ CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
чӏужу%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:чӏужу%>%{a%}лъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
чӏужу%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:чӏужу%>%{a%}лъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
чӏужу%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>:чӏужу%>%{a%}л LOC-CASES ; 
чӏужу%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:руччаби CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
чӏужу%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<erg%>:руччабаз CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
чӏужу%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:руччабаз%>ул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
чӏужу%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:руччабаз%>е CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
чӏужу%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>:руччабаз%> LOC-CASES ; 

LEXICON N-JAS-SG

%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<erg%>:%>%{a%}лъ CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>%{a%}лъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:%>%{a%}лъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>:%>%{a%}л%{ъ%} LOC-CASES ; 

LEXICON N-JAS-PL

%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>%{a%}л CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<erg%>:%>%{a%}з CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:%>%{a%}зул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:%>%{a%}зе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<f%>%<pl%>:%>%{a%}з LOC-CASES ; 

LEXICON N-JAS
! я/с (-алъ, -алъул, -ал)

N-JAS-SG ; 
N-JAS-PL ; 

LEXICON N-KIODO
! кӏодо (-ца, -л, -ял)

%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<nom%>: CLIT-SUBST-II ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<erg%>:%>ца CLIT-SUBST-I ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>л CLIT-SUBST-I ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:%>ле CLIT-SUBST-I ;
%<n%>%<f%>%<sg%>:%>л%{ъ%} LOC-CASES ;

N-JAS-PL ; 

LEXICON N-GEOGRAFIJA-SG 

%<nom%>: CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<erg%>:%>лъ CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<gen%>:%>лъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<dat%>:%>лъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
:%>л%{ъ%} LOC-CASES ; 

LEXICON N-GEOGRAFIJA
! география (-лъ, -лъул)

%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>: N-GEOGRAFIJA-SG ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>л CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<erg%>:%>з CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:%>зул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:%>зе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>:%>з LOC-CASES ; 

LEXICON N-APTEKA 
! аптека (-лъ, -лъул, -л)

N-GEOGRAFIJA ;

LEXICON N-EKSPEDICIJA 
! экспедиция (-лъ, -лъул, -л//-би)

N-GEOGRAFIJA ;

%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>би CLIT-SUBST-II ;  ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<erg%>:%>баз CLIT-SUBST-I ;  ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:%>базул CLIT-SUBST-I ;  ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:%>базе CLIT-SUBST-I ;  ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>:%>баз LOC-CASES ;  ! Dir/LR

LEXICON N-CIAJI
! цӏайи (-ялъ, -ялъул//цӏавул, -ял)

%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:йи CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<erg%>:йи%>ялъ CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:йи%>ялъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:в%>ул CLIT-SUBST-I ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:йи%>ялъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:йи%>ял%{ъ%} LOC-CASES ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:йи%>ял CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<erg%>:йи%>яз CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:йи%>язул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:йи%>язе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>:йи%>яз LOC-CASES ; 

LEXICON N-SPEKTAKL
! спектакл/ь (-иялъ, -иялъул, -иял)
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ь CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<erg%>:%>ялъ CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>ялъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:%>ялъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:%>ял%{ъ%} LOC-CASES ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>ял CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<erg%>:%>яца CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:%>язул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:%>язе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>:%>яз LOC-CASES ; 

LEXICON N-BUSEN
! бусен (-алъ//бусаца, -алъул//бусадул, бусаби)

%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ен CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<erg%>:ен%>алъ CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<erg%>:%>аца CLIT-SUBST-I ;  ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:ен%>алъул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>адул CLIT-SUBST-I ;  ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ен%>алъе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
!%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:%>ал%{ъ%} LOC-CASES ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<sg%>:%>а LOC-CASES ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>аби CLIT-SUBST-II ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<erg%>:%>абаз CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:%>абазул CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:%>абазе CLIT-SUBST-I ; 
%<n%>%<nt%>%<pl%>:%>абаз LOC-CASES ; 

LEXICON Nouns 
бихьинчи:бихьин N-BIHINCHI ; ! "мужчина"
гӏалимчи:гӏалим N-GIALIMCHI ; ! "учёный; учёный муж"
яс:яс N-JAS ; ! "девочка"
кӏодо:кӏодо N-KIODO ; ! "бабушка"
ясгӏадан:ясгӏадан N-JAS ; ! "девушка"
клуб:клуб N-JAS ; ! "клуб"
N-CHIUZHU ; ! "жена"
N-CHIUZHUGIADAN ; ! "женщина"
гӏалим:гӏалим N-CHIUZHU ; ! "академик"
яц:яц N-JAS ; ! "сестра"
тӏехь:тӏ N-TIEH ; ! "книга"
аптека:аптека N-APTEKA ; ! ""
этнология:этнология N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
коллегия:коллегия N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
антропология:антропология N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
онкология:онкология N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
субсидия:субсидия N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
автономия:автономия N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
бюрократия:бюрократия N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
демократия:демократия N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
сессия:сессия N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
лицензия:лицензия N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
стипендия:стипендия N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
компания:компания N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
энциклопедия:энциклопедия N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! "энциклопедия"
резолюция:резолюция N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! "резолюция"
революция:революция N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
химия:химия N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
авария:авария N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
технология:технология N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
армия:армия N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
монополия:монополия N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
энергия:энергия N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
ревизия:ревизия N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
дивизия:дивизия N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
экскурсия:экскурсия N-EKSPEDICIJA ; ! ""
экспедиция:экспедиция N-EKSPEDICIJA ; ! ""
инфекция:инфекция N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
конференция:конференция N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
инвестиция:инвестиция N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
коллективизация:коллективизация N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
реанимация:реанимация N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
аттестация:аттестация N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
организация:организация N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
диссертация:диссертация N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
лекция:лекция N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
дотация:дотация N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
информация:информация N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
академия:академия N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
станция:станция N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
райадминистрация:райадминистрация N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
коррупция:коррупция N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
филология:филология N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
продукция:продукция N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
категория:категория N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
инспекция:инспекция N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
электроэнергия:электроэнергия N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
травматология:травматология N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
секция:секция N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
гимназия:гимназия N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
лаборатория:лаборатория N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
комиссия:комиссия N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! "комиссия"
милиция:милиция N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! "милиция"
тарбия:тарбия N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! "воспитание"
география:география N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! "география"
археография:археография N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! "археография"
операция:операция N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
копия:копия N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
история:история N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
поэзия:поэзия N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
партия:партия N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
администрация:администрация N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
федерация:федерация N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
канализация:канализация N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
приватизация:приватизация N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
делегация:делегация N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
астрономия:астрономия N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
биография:биография N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
идеология:идеология N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
империя:империя N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
комментария:комментария N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
конституция:конституция N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
материя:материя N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
наркомания:наркомания N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
пенсия:пенсия N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
теория:теория N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
фамилия:фамилия N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
философия:философия N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
фотография:фотография N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
премия:премия N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
редакция:редакция N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
резиденция:резиденция N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
ревлюция:ревлюция N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! "" 
ревлюция:ревалюция N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! "" ! Use/Sub
экология:экология N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
газета:газета N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! ""
туркав:турка N-TURKAV ; ! "турок" ! FIXME:adj?
адыгеяв:адыгея N-TURKAV ; ! ""
спектакль:спектакл N-SPEKTAKL ; ! "спектакль"
ансамбль:ансамбл N-SPEKTAKL ; ! ""
муршид:муршид N-MURSHID ; ! ""
мурид:мурид N-MURSHID ; ! "мюрид; воин"
амир:амир N-MURSHID ; ! "эмир, правитель"
карьера:карьера N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! "карьера" ! Dir/LR ! Use/Sub
репрессия:репрессия N-GEOGRAFIJA ; ! "репрессия"
цӏайи:цӏа N-CIAJI ; ! "вес"
бусен:бус N-BUSEN ; ! "постель, тюфяк"
